California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
In case the owner fails to comply with any such demand, the encroachments specified in the demand become subject to Article 3 (commencing with Section 720), except that no further notice is required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

680.5.

The department and any utility as defined in Section 700 may enter into a contract for or apportioning the obligations and costs to be borne by each party for the removal, relocation or repair of facilities whenever necessary to accommodate any or all state highways which are not freeways, to the same extent and in the same manner as is authorized for state freeways in Section 707.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 98.)
-------------------------------------------

681.

Whenever a franchise shall have been granted by any county or city in any public highway heretofore or hereafter constituted a State highway, all of the rights of the grantor under such franchise, including the right to collect and receive tolls, charges or payments thereunder other than the rights transferred to the department by section 680, are reserved to such county or city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 631.)
-------------------------------------------

682.

Every city and county shall have power to grant franchises authorizing the exercise of any privilege in, along, across, under, through, over, and upon any state highway, or portion thereof, within its boundaries to the extent and in the manner that it shall have power to grant franchises authorizing the exercise of such privilege in, over, and upon city streets, or county highways, as the case may be, subject to the conditions and limitations provided in Sections 682 to 695, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 708.)
-------------------------------------------

682.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 731, the department may issue permits to counties and cities for the use of highways within their boundaries and to community-based nonprofit corporations for special events upon terms and conditions relating to the safe and orderly movement of traffic that the department finds necessary. A city or county or a community-based nonprofit corporation issued a permit may allow or conduct vending on or adjacent to the highway immediately preceding, during, or immediately following the permitted special event in accordance with the terms and conditions specified by the department in the permit.

Not more than four permits for the same activity at the same location shall be issued to any city or county or community-based nonprofit corporation in any calendar year. No permit shall be issued to a community-based nonprofit corporation unless that corporation has been issued an acknowledgment by the city or county within which the special event is proposed to be conducted.

Neither the department, in issuing permits for the use of highways, nor the city or county, in issuing acknowledgments, shall be responsible for the conduct or operation of the permitted activity and shall require the permit applicant to agree to indemnify and hold harmless the state and the city or county against any and all claims arising out of any activity for which the permit is issued.

(b) As used in this section,“community-based nonprofit corporation” means a corporation formed under the Nonprofit Corporation Law (Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Corporations Code) having an office located within the county within which the special event is to be held.

(c) As used in this section, “acknowledgment” means the issuance by a city or county to a community-based nonprofit corporation of a special event permit, road closure or detour permit, or letter of permission authorizing the special event for which a permit from the department is sought.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 17, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

682.7.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Event” means a competition event that encroaches a state highway.

(2) “Prize compensation” includes prize or purse money, other prizes, goods, or other compensation.

(b) The department shall require as a condition of a permit for any event that awards prize compensation to competitors in gendered categories, for any participant level that
 receives prize compensation, that the prize compensation for each gendered category be identical at each participant level. The department shall not approve a permit for an event that does not comply with this condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 276, Sec. 5.   (AB 467)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

683.

No franchise of any kind shall be granted in respect to any State highway or portion thereof which has been established as a freeway pursuant to the provisions of this code without the prior approval in writing of the department, except for crossings as provided in Section 685.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 977.)
-------------------------------------------

684.

No franchise shall be granted for the installation of street or other railroad tracks or the operation of street railroads or other railroads on any State highway without the prior approval in writing of the department except for crossings as provided in Section 685.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 977.)
-------------------------------------------

685.

In case a franchise is granted for the exercise of a privilege in a city street or county highway, approval of the department shall not be required in respect to intersections. Franchises may be granted extending across the common area of the intersection without any such approval. In cases where the grades of the state highway and the city street or county highway are separated, the franchise shall be exercised only on the city street or county highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 708.)
-------------------------------------------

686.

The department shall approve any franchise submitted for approval pursuant to Section 683 or 684 unless the department finds on the facts of the particular case that the exercise of the privilege proposed to be granted is incompatible with the primary use of the freeway or other State highway for vehicular traffic or with its improvement to serve its primary use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 977.)
-------------------------------------------

687.

Franchises may be granted under this article separately as to any state highway, or portion thereof, or in respect to both state highways, or portions thereof, and city streets or county highways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 708.)
-------------------------------------------

688.

In cases in which the approval of the department is not required, the city or county shall give notice to the department of any application for a franchise affecting a state highway at the time of the filing of such application by any applicant, so that the department may present to the legislative body of the city or county, as the case may be, any considerations by it deemed to be important. Such notice shall be given to the appropriate district director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

689.

No privilege shall be exercised in any state highway pursuant to any franchise granted under this article until a copy of such franchise, certified by the clerk of the grantor city or county, has been filed with the department. This may be filed with the district director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

690.

The department shall have the power to prescribe the location, within the limits of the State highway, of any physical property to be constructed or installed in, under, over or upon such State highway pursuant to any such franchise. Before constructing or installing any such physical property in any State highway, the holder of the franchise shall apply to the department, or its authorized agent, for a permit, and the department shall issue a permit, in which it may impose reasonable conditions as to location, method and manner of construction. All such physical property is subject to relocation in the cases and in the manner provided in Section 680.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 977.)
-------------------------------------------

691.

In the exercise within the limits of any State highway of any privilege granted by franchise, the holder thereof shall at all times be subject to all reasonable orders, rules and regulations of the department for the protection, maintenance or improvement of the highway or the safe and convenient use thereof as a public highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 977.)
-------------------------------------------

692.

Independently of or jointly with the grantor city or county, the department may enforce any obligation imposed by any franchise granted pursuant to Section 682 relating to the construction, reconstruction, improvement, repair, or maintenance of any state highway or portion thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 708.)
-------------------------------------------

693.

All sums payable by the grantee under any such franchise shall be paid to the grantor city or county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 708.)
-------------------------------------------

694.

All franchises heretofore granted by any city for the exercise of any privilege in any State highway, are hereby fully validated, legalized and made effective, to the same extent that such city at the time of making the grant had power to grant a franchise authorizing the exercise of such privilege in, over and upon city streets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 977.)
-------------------------------------------

695.

Failure of the department to act upon any application for approval under Sections 683 or 684 within 90 days after the filing of such application with the department shall be deemed to constitute approval thereof. The time herein prescribed may be extended with the consent of the grantor city or county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 708.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Special Provisions re Utilities in Freeways [700. - 711.]

700.

(a) “Person,” in addition to the definition in Section 19, includes any city, county, public corporation, or public district.

(b) “Utility facility” means any pole, poleline, pipe, pipeline, conduit, cable, aqueduct, or other structure or appurtenance thereof used for public or privately owned utility services, used to provide cable service or video service, as defined in Section 5830 of the Public Utilities Code, or used by any mutual organization supplying water or telephone service to its members.

(c) “Utility” means any person maintaining any utility facility.

(d) “Freeway” includes any toll
 bridge, including approaches, under the jurisdiction of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 1145)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

701.

This article is limited to state highways which are or shall become freeways. Article 2 (commencing with Section 670), except as inconsistent with this article, applies to freeways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 157.)
-------------------------------------------

702.

Whenever the department requires any utility to remove any utility facility lawfully maintained in the right of way of any freeway to a location entirely outside the freeway right of way, the department shall pay the reasonable and necessary cost of such removal. This includes both the cost of removal and the cost of relocation in a new location outside of the freeway right of way.

This section does not apply to the relocation of the utility facility from one point in a freeway to another point in the freeway, including the relocation in any service road or outer highway of the freeway or from one point of crossing of the freeway to another and reasonable point of crossing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

703.

Whenever the department requires a publicly owned utility to relocate within a freeway any utility facility lawfully maintained in any freeway which was not a state highway at the time such utility facility was originally installed therein, the department shall pay the cost of such relocation.

Whenever the department requires a privately owned utility to relocate within a freeway any utility facility used solely to supply water, which facility is lawfully maintained in any freeway which was not a state highway at the time such utility facility was originally installed therein, the department shall pay the cost of such relocation.

Whenever the department requires a privately owned utility to relocate within a freeway any utility facility, other than one used solely to supply water, which facility is lawfully maintained in any freeway which was not a state highway at the time such utility facility was originally installed therein, and it is established by the utility that it is not under express contractual obligation to relocate such facility at its own expense, the department shall pay the cost of such relocation.

A permit containing a contractual obligation which was accepted by the utility for maintenance or minor improvement of the facility after such road became a state highway shall not constitute a contractual obligation within the meaning of this section.

Publicly owned sewers and fire hydrants and any street lighting structure, whether publicly or privately owned, in any freeway shall be relocated, where necessary, at the expense of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1448.)
-------------------------------------------

704.

If the department requires the relocation within the right of way of any utility facility more than once within a period of 10 years, the department shall pay the cost of the second relocation and any subsequent relocation within such 10-year period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

705.

In any case in which the department is required under the provisions of this article to pay the cost of removal or relocation of any utility facility, it shall be entitled to credits as follows:

(1) In the amount of any betterment to the utility facility resulting from such removal or relocation, not in excess of the cost of the increased capacity of the facility.

(2) The salvage value of any materials or parts salvaged and retained by the utility.

(3) If a new facility or portion thereof is constructed to accomplish such removal or relocation, an allowance of an amount bearing the same proportion to the original cost of the displaced facility or portion thereof as the age thereof bears to the normal expected life thereof.

A credit shall not be allowed against any portion of the cost which is otherwise chargeable to the utility.

A credit allowance for age shall not be applied to publicly owned sewers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 676.)
-------------------------------------------

706.

The department and any utility required to remove a utility facility or to relocate any utility facility may, by agreement, provide for the respective amounts of the cost to be borne by each. The department may, without prejudice to its rights under Section 707, advance the cost of removal or relocation and if the department advances such cost, it is the duty of the utility to move its facilities as soon as reasonably possible so as not to delay freeway construction. In the case of any utility which is not financially able to bear the costs of removal or relocation, the department may by agreement provide for the work to be done on condition that the utility’s portion of the costs be repaid to the department over a period of time not exceeding 10 years.

Either party may maintain an action in a court of competent jurisdiction for an adjudication as to the obligations and costs to be borne by each party under such provisions of said contract at any time within four years after the cause of action first arose thereunder. Such a cause of action shall be deemed to arise upon and at the time of the completion by the utility of the removal or relocation in question, or at the time of breach of the agreement by either party. The filing of a claim with any state agency shall not be deemed a condition precedent to the maintenance by the utility of any such action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2355.)
-------------------------------------------

706.5.

In connection with the construction of State Highway Route 86 in Imperial County from Post Miles 58.4 to Post Miles 65.1 and the relocation of facilities of the Coachella Valley Water District necessitated by that project, the department may make a loan, for a term not exceeding 20 years, to the district for the relocation costs incurred, and to be incurred, by the district as a result of that project. The loan shall be subject to the terms and conditions that are mutually agreed upon, but shall require the district, in addition to making periodic payments on the loan, to annually pay to the department an amount at least equal to the sum of the pipeline portion of all development fees collected by the district during the preceding year in the service area served by the transverse waterline crossing of State Highway Route 86, less the district’s administrative and collection costs. The amounts so paid shall be deducted from the outstanding balance of the loan, and the remaining term of the loan correspondingly reduced.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 705, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

707.

In the event of failure to reach an agreement as provided in Section 706, the utility or the department may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction for apportionment of the cost between them in accordance with the provisions of this article. Such an action may be commenced within three years from the date of completion by the utility of the removal or relocation in question. The filing of a claim with any state agency shall not be deemed a condition precedent to the maintenance by the utility of any such action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2356.)
-------------------------------------------

707.5.

(A) The department and any utility as defined in Section 700 of this code may enter into a contract providing for or apportioning the obligations and costs to be borne by each party as to either or both of the following subject matters:

(1) Any or all removals or relocations of any utility facilities completed by the utility prior to the effective date of such contract as required by notice given by the department wherever necessary to accommodate any or all state freeways, where: (a) the obligations or costs in respect thereto to be borne by each party is in dispute; and (b) the claim of the utility is: (i) founded upon a removal or relocation completed by the utility not longer than three years immediately preceding the effective date of such contract; or (ii) involved in an action pending in a court of competent jurisdiction if such action was commenced within three years after completion by the utility of the removal or relocation in question; and

(2) Any or all removals or relocations of any utility facilities to be undertaken or completed by the utility after the effective date of such contract as required by notice given by the department wherever necessary to accommodate any or all state freeways.

(B) Those provisions of any such contract settling the claims of the parties in respect to any or all removals or relocations of any utility facilities completed by the utility prior to the effective date of such contract, as authorized in subdivision (A) (1) of this section, shall be irrevocable after the execution of such contract, except as the same may be changed or modified by mutual consent of the parties in writing; and either party may maintain an action in a court of competent jurisdiction upon such provisions of said contract at any time within two years after the effective date of such contract, and the utility need file no claim with any state agency as a condition precedent to the maintenance of any such action.

(C) Those provisions of any such contract dealing with any or all removals or relocations of any utility facilities to be undertaken or completed by the utility after the effective date of such contract, as authorized in subdivision (A) (2) of this section, shall be under and subject to the following limitations and requirements:

(1) While such provisions of said contract remain in effect, such provisions shall govern exclusively the determination of the obligations and costs to be borne by each party in regard to every removal or relocation covered thereby undertaken or completed by the utility after the effective date of such contract, whether notice in respect thereto was given by the department to the utility before or after the effective date of such contract, in lieu of the determination thereof under the foregoing provisions of this article as now or hereafter existing and any and all other laws which would be applicable to said subject matter but for said contract, save to the extent that any such laws may be referred to, retained, and made applicable by, such provisions of said contracts; provided: (a) where before the effective date of a contract entered into under this section the parties executed an agreement in respect to the obligations and costs to be borne by each party as to a particular removal or relocation under a notice given by the department, the provisions of such last mentioned agreement shall govern as to the obligations and costs to be borne by each party in respect thereto; and (b) where a particular notice given by the department before the effective date of a contract entered into under this section specifies a removal or relocation to be made at the expense of the utility, the utility shall be and remain bound thereby unless the utility advised the department in writing of its disagreement with such determination within the time specified in any agreement then in effect between the department and the utility in respect to the procedure to be followed in such cases, or, if none, within a reasonable time after receipt by the utility of said notice.

(2) Either party may maintain an action in a court of competent jurisdiction for an adjudication as to the obligations and costs to be borne by each party under such provisions of said contract at any time within four years after the cause of action first arose thereunder. Such a cause of action shall be deemed to arise upon and at the time of the completion by the utility of the removal or relocation in question. The filing of a claim with any state agency shall not be deemed a condition precedent to the maintenance by the utility of any such action.

(3) Such provisions of said contract shall terminate: (i) automatically upon the repeal of this section or of subdivisions (A) (2) and (C) hereof; and (ii) also, unless sooner so automatically terminated, at such time or in such manner as may be provided in said contract; and in the event of either such termination, the laws applicable to the subject matter of such provisions of said contract as existing at the time of such termination shall thereafter govern, save as to removals or relocations theretofore required of the utility by the department under notice mailed or delivered to the utility prior to such termination, whether work upon such removal or relocation has theretofore commenced, is in progress, or has been completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 824.)
-------------------------------------------

708.

Every utility is entitled to a permit for such reasonable crossings of any freeway, as may be required for the proper discharge of the utility’s service to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

709.

The department shall exercise a reasonable discretion in acting on applications of utilities for permits to occupy freeways for longitudinal locations of facilities, as may be required for the proper discharge of their services to the public. The department may, however, refuse to grant any applications for any such longitudinal installation which would be inconsistent with public safety or the continued unobstructed use of the freeway for vehicular traffic, or for any type of utility structure inconsistent with the aesthetic values of any landscaped freeway within, or approaching within one mile of, the limits of any city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

710.

The department, in acting upon applications for utility permits, shall consider both the interests of the traveling public upon the freeway and the needs of consumers for public utility services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

711.

Nothing in this article is intended to prevent the department from making reasonable rules and regulations and requiring reasonable conditions in permits concerning the place, manner and method of location of utility facilities in, under, over or along freeways. Specifically, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the department may make regulations or require conditions to the end that the cutting of pavement on freeways and a consequential impairment of the use thereof by the traveling public, shall be avoided insofar as possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Nuisance and Penal Provisions [720. - 734.]

720.

If any encroachment exists in, under or over any State highway, the department may require the removal of such encroachment in the manner provided in this article.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 680 and 721, notice shall be given to the owner, occupant or person in possession of the encroachment, or to any other person causing or suffering the encroachment to exist, by serving upon any such person a notice containing a demand for the immediate removal of such encroachment from within such highway. Any such notice shall describe the encroachment complained of with reasonable certainty as to its character and location. In lieu of service upon such person, service of such notice may also be made by registered mail and by posting, for a period of five days, a copy of the notice on the encroachment described in the notice. In the case of an owner, occupant or person in possession, who is not present in the county, the notice may be given to his agent in lieu of service by mailing and posting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1937, Ch. 931.)
-------------------------------------------

721.

The department may immediately remove from any state highway any encroachment that:

(a) Is not removed, or the removal of which is not commenced and thereafter diligently prosecuted, prior to the expiration of five days from and after the service of the notice.

(b) Obstructs or prevents the use of the highway by the public.

(c) Consists of refuse.

(d) Is an advertising sign of any description, unless excepted by Section 670.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 345, Sec. 10.   (AB 2752)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

722.

The department may remove an encroachment on the failure of the owner to comply with a notice or demand of the department under the provisions of Section 673, Section 680, or Section 720, and shall have an action to recover the expense of the removal, costs, and expenses of suit and, in addition thereto, the sum of three hundred fifty dollars ($350) for each day the encroachment remains after the expiration of five days from the service of the notice or the demand.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 182, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

723.

If the owner, occupant, or person in possession of the encroachment, or person causing or suffering the encroachment to exist, or the agent of any of them, disputes or denies the existence of the encroachment, or refuses to remove or permit the removal of the encroachment, the department, in the name of the people of the State of California, may commence, in a court of competent jurisdiction, an action to abate the encroachment as a public nuisance. If judgment is recovered by the department, it may, in addition to having the encroachment adjudged a nuisance and abated, recover three hundred fifty dollars ($350) for each day the encroachment remains after the service of the notice in the manner provided in Section 720, and may also recover its costs and expenses incurred in the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 182, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

724.

Unless the encroachment is authorized under Article 2 (commencing with Section 670), any person owning, controlling, or placing, or causing or suffering to exist, any encroachment within any state highway after the service upon that person of the notice, in the manner provided in Section 720, is, in addition to any civil liability therefor, guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 158.)
-------------------------------------------

725.

It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following acts:

(a) Drain water, or permit water to be drained, from his lands onto any State highway by any means which results in damage to the highway.

(b) Obstruct any natural water course so as to:

(1) Prevent, impede or restrict the natural flow of waters from any State highway into and through such water course, unless other adequate and proper drainage is provided.

(2) Cause waters to be impounded within any State highway, to the damage of the highway.

(3) Cause interference with, or damage or hazard to public travel.

(c) Store or distribute water for any purpose so as to permit it to overflow onto, to saturate by seepage, or to obstruct any State highway, to the damage of the highway.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

726.

When notice thereof is given by the department, in the manner provided by section 720, to any person permitting or suffering such damage to be done to any State highway, or permitting or suffering any such condition to exist, such person shall immediately cease and discontinue such diversion of waters or shall discontinue and prevent such drainage, seepage, or overflow and shall repair the highway at his own expense.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

727.

If a person is thus notified, and fails, neglects, or refuses to cease and discontinue the diversion, to discontinue and prevent the drainage, seepage, or overflow of the waters, or to make the repairs required by Section 726, the department may make the repairs and may also perform work as is necessary to prevent the further drainage, diversion, overflow, or seepage of the waters.

The department, in the name of the people of the State of California, may recover in an action at law, in a court of competent jurisdiction, the amount expended for the repairs and work and, in addition thereto, the sum of three hundred fifty dollars ($350) for each day the drainage, diversion, overflow or seepage of waters is permitted to continue after the service of the notice in the manner required by Section 726, together with the costs and expenses incurred in the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 182, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

728.

Any person proposing or desiring to excavate or construct ditches in, under or over any State highway, to carry water for any purpose, shall construct, without expense to the State, such bridges, culverts, pipes, siphons or crossings as are necessary adequately and properly to carry such water in, under or over such State highway.

Any such construction shall be done in accordance with the permit and pursuant to section 671, and shall be subject to the approval of the department. The issuance of any such permit may be withheld until the department finds that proper and adequate provision is made for the protection of such State highway and for the safety of travel thereon.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

729.

Upon the neglect or refusal of any person to comply with the provisions of section 728, the department may construct any such crossing and may recover, in the name of the people of the State of California, in an action at law in any court of competent jurisdiction, the expense of such construction, together with the costs and expenses incurred in any such action.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

730.

Any person who by any means wilfully or negligently injures or damages any State highway is liable for the repair thereof, and the department, in the name of the people of the State of California, may recover, in an action in any court of competent jurisdiction, the amount expended for such repairs, together with the costs and expenses incurred in any such action.

Any person wilfully injuring any bridge, culvert or structure in or on any State highway is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1937, Ch. 931.)
-------------------------------------------

730.5.

Any person who by any means, without a permit issued by the department, digs up, cuts down, destroys, prunes, trims, or otherwise injures any tree or shrub on any state highway, rights-of-way, or property shall be liable for a penalty in the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each tree so damaged and one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each shrub so damaged; and the department, in the name of the people of the State of California, may recover the penalty in an action at law, in a court of competent jurisdiction, together with the costs and expenses, including attorney and expert fees, incurred in the action and the actual costs incurred because of the damage to any tree or shrub on state property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

731.

Any vehicle or structure parked or placed wholly or partly within any state highway, for the purpose of selling the same or of selling therefrom or therein any article, service or thing, is a public nuisance and the department may immediately remove that vehicle or structure from within any highway.

Any person parking any vehicle or placing any structure wholly or partly within any highway for the purpose of selling that vehicle or structure, or of selling therefrom or therein any article or thing, and any person selling, displaying for sale, or offering for sale any article or thing either in or from that vehicle or structure so parked or placed, and any person storing, servicing, repairing or otherwise working upon any vehicle, other than upon a vehicle which is temporarily disabled, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

The California Highway Patrol and all peace officers from local law enforcement agencies may enforce the provisions of this chapter with respect to highways under their respective jurisdiction and shall cooperate with the department to that end. Whenever any member of the California Highway Patrol or any peace officer from a local law enforcement agency removes a vehicle from a highway under the provisions of this section, then all of the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 22850), Chapter 10, Division 11 of the Vehicle Code with reference to the removal of a vehicle from a highway shall be applicable.

This section does not prohibit a seller from taking orders or delivering any commodity from a vehicle on that part of any state highway immediately adjacent to the premises of the purchaser; prohibit an owner or operator of a vehicle, or a mechanic, from servicing, repairing or otherwise working upon any vehicle which is temporarily disabled in a manner and to an extent that it is impossible to avoid stopping that vehicle within the highway; or prohibit coin-operated public telephones and related telephone structures in park and ride lots, vista points, and truck inspection facilities within state highway rights-of-way for use by the general public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 89, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

731.5.

Section 731 does not apply to a coin-activated or credit card-activated telephone available for public use shared and maintained within any bus passenger shelter lawfully erected upon any state highway other than a freeway or expressway if the person placing the telephone has obtained a permit from the department pursuant to Section 670.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 512, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

732.

Any person who wilfully injures, defaces, breaks down or removes any monument or stake placed, erected or used by the department to designate any point in the boundary or survey of any State highway or proposed State highway is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

732.5.

Survey monuments shall be preserved, referenced, or replaced pursuant to Section 8771 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 458, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

733.

All money recovered under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid into any fund which is available to the department for highway purposes and is designated by the department to receive such payment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

734.

The procedure provided in this article is not exclusive and shall not prohibit the department from exercising any other remedy provided by law to prevent damage to or to protect any State highway.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Protection of Beds of Mapped Highways [740. - 742.]

740.

As used in this article:

“Mapped highway” means a highway which is laid out, surveyed, and delineated on a map of such size, scale, and detail that the exact location on the ground which the highway is to occupy can be ascertained.

“Map” includes plat.

“Owner” includes any person entitled to the use or possession of real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1451.)
-------------------------------------------

740.2.

Whenever the department has laid out and surveyed a proposed state highway in any county or city it shall prepare a map of such highway sufficient to show the location of such highway on each parcel of land to be traversed or otherwise occupied by the highway when constructed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 471.)
-------------------------------------------

740.4.

The department shall transmit a copy of such map insofar as it relates to the land within a county to the planning commission of the county.
